Washington statutes.
RCW 33.44.130

Rules implementing chapter—Standard.

The director of financial institutions shall adopt such rules under the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, as are necessary to implement this chapter in a manner which protects the relative interests of members, depositors, borrowers, stockholders, and creditors.

[ 1994 c 92 s 470; 1982 c 3 s 79.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.